MiKTeX/default/texmflocal/hunspell/dicts/ruen_RUGB.dic
adapt/niRGuBNDvSV
advocate/SGVD
appetite/MSV
cleanness/U
commemorate/GvSDNnV
conjunct/SDVv
curd/SvGuMDV
devastate/GDkVNnS
dissuade/VSGD
eatable/U
ellipse/MWS
emanate/DnSVGN
exclude/XuSVDGNv
format/DASGV
imaginably/U
indicate/vnNDSGV
instinct/VMvS
maladapt/VD
militarist/W
palliate/SGnNVDv
perceived/U
project/MSDGVv
refract/DvSGVy
settles/U
suffocate/GknDSVN
transformed/U
adsorb/VvXDNGS
alphabet/qQsSMWw1
authenticated/U
contrast/kDSZGvV
corrupted/U
denigrate/VSDnGN
don/DnGSNV
explainable/U
extrapolate/SNnGVD
granule/NMnVS
inflect/DSGxV
interpolate/nDSVNG
justified/U
meteorite/MWS
plod/DRJSGV
predictably/U
promo/uSV
scientific/UY
seduce/RvSGDNnVu
some/W
tested/AUK
vote/DRMGvVS
agent/MDVGS
announced/U
anticipate/VGnyDNvS
audit/dVMSXNy
camber/MdSW
collude/SNVDGX
congenial/U
conglomerate/MNSGnDV
defend/uvV
delineate/DGNnVS
dilate/nVDGNSyhi
distribute/uDvGV
edited/FU
exhilarate/SGVDNkn
governable/U
idyll/W1SM
imagine/lNVSJnGvuD
interpret/7SNrvndV
manned/fU
obtrude/DXvuSNGV
preserve/VNn
published/U
ratiocinate/DnNVSG
ruminate/NSGDVnv
scheme/SRGWMD
soiled/U
trusted/U
vituperate/vDSVGNn
affricate/SVMN
approximate/nYSNVGvD
atheist/M1WS
avoidably/U
cogitate/SnDNGV
consciously/U
consecrate/VDGnSN
correct/7TSxVuYGvDP
derive/vnVuN
dyad/SMW
enumerate/GSVDNn
extract/GvSDV7
fittingly/U
initiated/U
institute/RSxDGV
lubricate/SGnNDV
narrate/NvGnVDS
offend/GVDvRuS
pedagogy/W1SMw
persuade/DGuRNXVSv
plumbed/U
prevent/7vVul
provoke/RknvGVSNuD
recuperate/GNDSnV
retrospect/VMv
rewarded/U
traceable/U
transgress/NXVSGD
adumbrate/nDvGSNV
appreciate/SNuyvGnDV
autocrat/MS1W
bars/UCE
causate/Vv
congest/GSVD
contribute/DvGyV
declared/AKU
detonate/DSGVNn
eradicate/GNDSVn
extort/DSVG
fairness/U
iconoclast/SMW
inspiring/U
iterate/vSVDNGn
obtrusive/UY
pervade/GuvNDSV
pictograph/MSW
reliably/U
sport/Vum5kD2SZMGv
synchronized/UC
xerography/MW
агитировать/LQTU
амикошонствовать/LQU
ассигновать/LQRTU
беречь/U
блудить/BLPW
бороновать/LQTU
валять/BLPU
варганить/LW
вдеть/LRV
взбросить/LRW
взволноваться/LRTU
вздуть/LRV
винтить/BLPW
внедряться/BLPU
водрузить/BLRW
возжаждать/LRV
возопить/BLRW
ворчать/LTU
воспретить/BLRW
вразумляться/BLPU
вспенить/LRW
вывалить/BLRW
выверять/BLPU
выкатить/BLRW
выместить/BLRW
выправлять/BLPU
выразить/BLRW
выстудить/BLRW
вычистить/BLRW
выщипать/LMRV
галопировать/LQU
гоняться/BLPU
гостить/BLPW
деградировать/LQTU
денатурировать/LQU
дивить/BLPW
дискутировать/LQTU
долдонить/LPTW
долить/LRV
доминировать/LQTU
дочистить/BLRW
единоборствовать/LQU
жариться/LPTW
жевать/LQTV
забуксовать/LRTU
завесить/LRTW
загрипповать/LRU
загромоздить/LRW
задуть/LRV
закабалять/LPU
закалить/BLRW
закутить/LRW
залить/LRV
замариновать/LRTU
замутить/BLRW
запировать/LRU
запросить/BLRW
заровнять/BLRU
заслюнявить/LRW
затемнить/BLRW
заткнуть/BLRU
зацепить/BLRW
зашнырять/LRU
знакомиться/LPTW
изгаляться/LPU
изжевать/LRTV
излучить/LRW
изъясниться/BLRW
икнуть/BLRU
инспектировать/LQTU
испестрять/LPU
истончиться/LRW
канонизировать/LQTU
кипятить/BLPW
козырять/BLPU
конкатенировать/LQU
корчевать/LQTU
корчиться/BLPW
крапать/LMPV
куражиться/LW
кутнуть/LRU
лоцировать/LQTU
манить/BLPW
маяться/LPTU
молибденировать/LQU
морщиться/BLPW
наводиться/LPW
надпилить/BLRW
наехать/LRV
накрутить/BLRW
налеплять/LPU
наносить/BLPW
наплеваться/LRV
нарушить/LRTW
нахамить/BLRW
нивелировать/LQTU
носиться/BLPW
обезножить/LRW
обжить/LRV
облапошить/LRTW
обнулить/BLRW
обороняться/BLPU
обсадить/BLRW
общипать/LRV
объясниться/BLRW
ожесточить/LRW
окоротить/BLRW
окропляться/LPU
опоганить/LRW
освежиться/BLRW
ослабляться/BLPU
основать/LRTV
оспорить/LRTW
отворить/BLRW
отлепить/BLRW
отмолчаться/LRU
отправить/LRTW
отрепать/LRV
отстроиться/LRTW
отуплять/LPU
отяготить/LRW
парить/LPTW
патриаршествовать/LQU
перевыполнить/BLRW
пережить/LRV
переключиться/BLRW
перемолотить/LRW
переоборудовать/LRTU
перепить/LRV
перерубить/BLRW
переучить/LRW
пилотировать/LQTU
побиться/LRV
повыстроить/LRW
подковылять/LRU
подкраситься/LRTW
подсушить/BLRW
поехать/LRV
покачнуть/BLRU
покорить/BLRW
помыслить/BLRW
попить/LRV
попробовать/LRTU
поскупиться/LRW
похваляться/BLPU
похоронить/BLRW
прибить/LRV
приварить/BLRW
привернуть/BLRU
прилить/LRV
примоститься/BLRW
притащить/BLRW
притенять/LPU
прогневить/LRW
продуться/LRV
прожужжать/LRU
просверлить/BLRW
прослышать/LRU
просыпать/LMPRV
пудрить/BLPW
равнять/BLPU
раззнакомиться/LRTW
разодеть/LRV
разъярять/BLPU
раскатиться/BLRW
рассовать/LRV
расстроиться/LRTW
растравлять/BLPU
репатриироваться/LQU
рядить/BLPW
свидетельствовать/LQTU
сжалиться/LRTW
склевать/LRV
скребнуть/BLRU
смежить/LRW
сортироваться/LQTU
соскучиться/LRTW
ссыпаться/LMPV
стасовать/LRTU
столбить/LPW
тасовать/LQTU
тащиться/BLPW
убыстрять/BLPU
увеселить/BLRW
увить/LRV
укорениться/BLRW
умолять/BLPU
упросить/BLRW
уткнуть/BLRU
утомить/BLRW
фырчать/LU
чернить/BLPW
шиковать/LQTU
щипаться/BLMPV
эшелонировать/LQU
